Louisiana, session 2026, SB485.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:3078 is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 33:3077(8) is
hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3077. Definitions
Whenever used in this Part, unless a different meaning clearly appears in the
context, the following terms, whether used in the singular or plural, shall be given
the following interpretations:
* * *
(8) "Insurance premium tax" means a municipal license tax imposed on
insurers pursuant to R.S. 22:833 or any other applicable provision of law, based
upon premiums written on risks located within the taxing jurisdiction.
§3078. Continued levy of tax by East Baton Rouge Parish Insurance premium tax;
transition; authority to levy
A. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, in the event the city of St.
George, as approved by the voters on October 12, 2019, is incorporated, the parish
may continue to levy and collect the parish tax within the corporate limits of the
municipality pursuant to an intergovernmental agreement between the parish and
municipality for the purpose of providing essential public services to, or funding
essential public services for, the citizens within St. George until the St. George
Transition District levies and collects a two percent sales and use tax, the
municipality levies and collects a two percent sales and use tax, the end of the
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 485 ENROLLED
quarter following the election to impose the municipal tax if the proposition is not
approved by the electorate, or twelve months after the incorporation becomes final,
whichever occurs first. beginning on January 1. 2027, the city of St. George shall
exclusively exercise all municipal authority to levy, collect, administer, and
enforce any insurance premium tax, as defined in R.S. 33:3077, on risk located
within the corporate limits of the city of St. George.
B. The city of Baton Rouge and the parish of East Baton Rouge,
including any component of the consolidated government, shall not levy, collect,
administer, or receive any insurance premium tax on risks located within the
corporate limits of the city of St. George.
C. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to authorize duplicative
taxation. An insurer shall be subject to only one local insurance premium tax
for a given risk and period.
D. The governing authority of the city of St. George and governing
authority of the parish of East Baton Rouge may enter into an
intergovernmental agreement solely for the purposes of records transfer,
closeout of prior records, and administrative cooperation, but not for the
continued collection of the insurance premium tax described in this Section by
the parish or consolidated government.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
Section 3. The provisions of this Act shall apply prospectively only to premiums
attributable to periods beginning on and after January 1, 2027.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.